Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.190

Distribution of funds.

After deduction of those costs of the state treasurer that are described under *RCW 36.22.180, the balance of the funds will be distributed to the counties according to the following formula: One-half of the funds available shall be equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance will be distributed among the counties in direct proportion to their population as it relates to the total state's population based on the most recent population statistics.

[ 1989 c 204 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.22.180 was repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 122, effective July 1, 1991.

Findings—1989 c 204: See note following RCW 36.22.160.